ch.aff
FLAG             long    # two-character affix identifiers
#=======================================================================================================================
# [BH] Suffix - BENEFACTIVE  -iyi, -guiyi, -iguiyi
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  To do something for / for the benefit of someone else
#=======================================================================================================================
SFX BH Y 4
SFX BH 0 iyi [^aeiou] B
SFX BH 0 yiyi [aeiu] B
SFX BH ao aguiyi . B
SFX BH 1 iguiyi [o] B


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BI] REDUPLICATION - INTENSIFICATION (/AUGMENTATION?)  (Final Reduplication)
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Word-final repetition causes intensification / augmentation / diminution of the thing/quality
#=======================================================================================================================
# RDP BI Y 1
# RDP BI . /09 . INTENS   (Custom algorithm in morphological breakdown... for spellcheck will need the following--)

#*&*& -- Final reduplication is going to be huge.  Will need to consider all combinations of (presented below by frequency):
# onset: k,m,b,s,p,t,d,f,g,l,h,n,ch,r,pr,y,tr,pl,br,gr,kr,fr,kl,ng,bl,gl,dr,sk,sl,fl
# vowel: å,i,a,e,o,u,ai,ue,ao,ie,ui,ua,io,ia
# final: n,',s,t,k,g,m,f,p,d,h,l,b,r
# for 5880 combinations
# (or more if prior vowels are needed to figure out wyllable boundaries)


#=======================================================================================================================
# [BL] Initial Phonological Process - VOWEL FRONTING
#~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
# Definition:  Vowel Harmony rules needed to find appropriate roots
#=======================================================================================================================
PFX BL Y 78
PFX BL o e [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL u i [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL bå ba [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL bo be [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL bu bi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL blå bla [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL blo ble [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL blu bli [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL brå bra [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL bro bre [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL bru bri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL chå cha [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL cho che [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL chu chi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL då da [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL do de [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL du di [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL få fa [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL fo fe [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL fu fi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL flå fla [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL flo fle [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL flu fli [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL frå fra [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL fro fre [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL fru fri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL gå ga [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL go ge [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL gu gi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL glo gle [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL grå gra [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL gru gri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL hå ha [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ho he [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL hu hi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL kå ka [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ko ke [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ku ki [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL klå kla [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL klo kle [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL kru kri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL lå la [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL lo le [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL lu li [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL må ma [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL mo me [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL mu mi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL nå na [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL no ne [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL nu ni [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ngå nga [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ngo nge [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ngu ngi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL på pa [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL po pe [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL pu pi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL plå pla [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL plo ple [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL plu pli [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL pro pre [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL pru pri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL rå ra [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ro re [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL ru ri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL så sa [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL so se [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL su si [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL slå sla [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL slo sle [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL slu sli [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL tå ta [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL to te [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL tu ti [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL trå tra [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL tro tre [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL tru tri [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL yo ye [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
PFX BL yu yi [^aeiou] (Vowel Fronting)
